Washington statutes.
RCW 31.20.110

Funds to be deposited in designated depository.

A development credit corporation shall not deposit any of its funds in any institution unless such institution has been designated as a depository by a vote of a majority of the directors, exclusive of the vote of any director who is an officer or director of the depository so designated.

[ 1959 c 213 s 11.]